West Virginia, session 2026, SB285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. West Virginia State Police. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15-2-18 of this code, modified by the West Virginia State Police to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the West Virginia State Police (contracted police or security services, 81 CSR 05), is authorized.